Utah statutes.
72-10-104.   Investigations and hearings -- Powers.

(1)  The department may conduct investigations, inquiries, and hearings concerning matters covered by this chapter and accidents or injuries incident to the operation of aircraft occurring within this state.

(2)  The department may:

(a)  administer oaths and affirmations;

(b)  certify to all official acts;

(c)  issue subpoenas;

(d)  compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses; and

(e)  compel the production of papers, books, and documents.

(3) (a)  If any person fails to comply with any subpoena or order issued by the department, the department may petition any district court in this state to order compliance.

(b)  The district court may order the person to comply with the requirements of the subpoena or order of the department, or to give evidence upon the matter in question.

(c)  Any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as contempt.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 365, 1998 General Session

